Washington statutes.
RCW 12.04.130

Jurisdiction, when acquired.

The court shall be deemed to have obtained possession of the case from the time the complaint or claim is filed, after completion of service, whether by publication or otherwise, and shall have control of all subsequent proceedings. In the case of proceedings to civilly enforce a money judgment entered in a municipal court or municipal department of a district court organized under the laws of this state, the court shall have jurisdiction over the proceedings from the time of filing an abstract or transcript of judgment; upon which filing the municipal judgment shall be recognized as a judgment of the court, provided that the court shall not have authority to vacate or amend the underlying municipal judgment.

[ 2007 c 46 s 4; Code 1881 s 1723; 1873 p 338 s 30; RRS s 1769.]